Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB856.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 230(a), 338(d) and 407.1(b) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, are amended to read:Section 230. Assessment.--(a) The department is authorized and required to make the inquiries, determinations and assessments of the tax (including interest, additions and penalties) imposed by this article. A notice of assessment and 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 demand for payment shall be mailed to the taxpayer. The notice shall set forth the basis of the assessment. A notice of assessment or notice of adjustment issued by the department shall contain information concerning the items being adjusted and an explanation regarding why items are being adjusted in the notice of assessment or notice of adjustment.* * *Section 338. Assessment.--* * *(d) A notice of assessment issued by the department pursuant to this article shall be mailed to the taxpayer. The notice shall set forth the basis of the assessment. A notice of assessment or notice of adjustment issued by the department shall contain information concerning the items being adjusted and an explanation regarding why items are being adjusted in the notice of assessment or notice of adjustment.Section 407.1. Assessments.--* * *(b) A notice of assessment and demand for payment shall be mailed to the taxpayer. The notice shall set forth the basis of the assessment. The assessment shall be paid to the department upon receipt of the notice of assessment. A notice of assessment or notice of adjustment issued by the department shall contain information concerning the items being adjusted and an explanation regarding why items are being adjusted in the notice of assessment or notice of adjustment. Payment of the assessment shall be without prejudice to the right of the taxpayer to file a petition for reassessment in the manner prescribed by Article XXVII.* * *Section 2. Section 2702(a)(1) of the act, amended October 29, 2024 (P.L.1086, No.123), is amended and the section is 20250HB0856PN0894 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 2702. Petition for reassessment.(a) General rule.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), a taxpayer may file a petition for reassessment with the department within 60 days after the mailing date of the notice of assessment. The 60-day period for a taxpayer to file a petition for reassessment with the department shall not commence unless the notice of assessment or notice of adjustment issued by the department contains information concerning the items being adjusted and an explanation regarding why items are being adjusted in the notice of assessment or notice of adjustment.* * *(a.3) Extension for filing petition.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may extend the date for filing a petition f or reassessment under subsection (a) if all of the following apply:(1) A taxpayer files a w ritten application to the department that demonstrates good cause for the extension.(2) The department finds that granting the written application under paragraph (1) will not prejudice the Commonwealth.* * *Section 3. Section 3003.1 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 3003.1. Petitions for Refunds.--* * *(d.1) In the case of the Department of Revenue applying a tax overpayment or tax credit to satisfy, either in whole or in part, an assessment, a petition for refund must be filed with 20250HB0856PN0894 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the department within six months of the mailing date of the notice of adjustment.* * *Section 4. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 3003.26. Compromise or Adjustment of Assessments.--(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in the case of doubtful liability or financial hardship of a taxpayer or in order to promote effective tax administration, the Department of Revenue may compromise an assessment of a tax imposed under this act without the requirement that the taxpayer appeal the assessment.(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of Revenue shall adjust an assessment of a tax imposed under this act without the requirement that the taxpayer appeal the assessment if any of the following apply:(1) The assessment is a result of a clerical error made by the Department of Revenue.(2) There is an issue with the existence of a payment or tax credit.(3) The taxpayer failed to provide necessary documentation with a tax return.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0856PN0894 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122